Wisconsin, session 2025, AB636.
do enact as follows:AB636,13Section 1. 440.52 (10) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB636,2,84440.52 (10) (a) Authority. All proprietary schools shall be examined and 5approved by the department before operating in this state. Approval shall be 6granted to schools meeting the criteria established by the department for a period 1not to exceed one year. No school may advertise in this state unless approved by the 2department. All approved schools shall submit quarterly reports, including 3information on enrollment, veteran enrollment, number of teachers and their 4qualifications, course offerings, number of graduates, number of graduates 5successfully employed, and such other information as the department considers 6necessary. If a school closure results in losses to students, parents, or sponsors, the 7department may authorize the full or partial payment of those losses from the 8appropriation under s. 20.165 (1) (jt).AB636,2,99